Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6020
Visitor; visitation procedures.

Any person entering a nursing home pursuant to section 71-6019 shall first notify appropriate nursing home personnel of his or her presence. He or she shall, upon request, produce identification to establish his or her identity. No such person shall enter the immediate living area of any resident without first identifying himself or herself and then receiving permission from the resident to enter. The rights of other residents present in the room shall be respected.

Laws 1983, LB 235, § 13.